California statutes. Commercial Code
(b) If presentment is made by notice and payment, acceptance, or request for compliance with a requirement under Section 3501 is not received by the close of business on the day after maturity or, in the case of demand items, by the close of business on the third banking day after notice was sent, the presenting bank may treat the item as dishonored and charge any drawer or indorser by sending it notice of the facts.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4210 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4213.

(a) With respect to settlement by a bank, the medium and time of settlement may be prescribed by Federal Reserve regulations or circulars, clearing house rules, and the like, or agreement. In the absence of that prescription, the following are applicable:

(1) The medium of settlement is cash or credit to an account in a federal reserve bank of or specified by the person to receive settlement.

(2) The time of settlement is any of the following:

(A) With respect to tender of settlement by cash, a cashier’s check, or teller’s check, when the cash or check is sent or delivered.

(B) With respect to tender of settlement by credit in an account in a federal reserve bank, when the credit is made.

(C) With respect to tender of settlement by a credit or debit to an account in a bank, when the credit or debit is made or, in the case of
 tender of settlement by authority to charge an account, when the authority is sent or delivered.

(D) With respect to tender of settlement by a funds transfer, when payment is made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11406 to the person receiving settlement.

(b) If the tender of settlement is not by a medium authorized by subdivision (a) or the time of settlement is not fixed by subdivision (a), no settlement occurs until the tender of settlement is accepted by the person receiving settlement.

(c) If settlement for an item is made by cashier’s check or teller’s check and the person receiving settlement, before its midnight deadline either:

(1) Presents or forwards the check for collection, settlement is final when the check is finally paid.

(2) Fails to present or forward the check for collection, settlement is final at the midnight deadline of the person
 receiving settlement.

(d) If settlement for an item is made by giving authority to charge the account of the bank giving settlement in the bank receiving settlement, settlement is final when the charge is made by the bank receiving settlement if there are funds available in the account for the amount of the item.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4214.

(a) If a collecting bank has made provisional settlement with its customer for an item and fails by reason of dishonor, suspension of payments by a bank, or otherwise to receive settlement for the item which is or becomes final, the bank may revoke the settlement given by it, charge back the amount of any credit given for the item to its customer’s account, or obtain refund from its customer, whether or not it is able to return the item, if by its midnight deadline or within a longer reasonable time after it learns the facts it returns the item or sends notification of the facts. If the return or notice is delayed beyond the bank’s midnight deadline or a longer reasonable time after it learns the facts, the bank may revoke the settlement, charge back the credit, or obtain refund from its customer, but it is liable for any loss resulting from the delay. These rights to revoke, charge back and obtain refund terminate if and when a settlement for the item received by the
 bank is or becomes final.

(b) A collecting bank returns an item when it is sent or delivered to the bank’s customer or transferor or pursuant to its instructions.

(c) A depositary bank that is also the payor may charge back the amount of an item to its customer’s account or obtain refund in accordance with the section governing return of an item received by a payor bank for credit on its books (Section 4301).

(d) The right to charge back is not affected by either of the following:

(1) Previous use of a credit given for the item.

(2) Failure by any bank to exercise ordinary care with respect to the item, but a bank so failing remains liable.

(e) A failure to charge back or claim refund does not affect other rights of the bank against the customer or any other party.

(f) If credit is given in dollars as the
 equivalent of the value of an item payable in foreign money, the dollar amount of any charge-back or refund shall be calculated on the basis of the bank-offered spot rate for the foreign money prevailing on the day when the person entitled to the charge-back or refund learns that it will not receive payment in ordinary course.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4212 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4215.

(a) An item is finally paid by a payor bank when the bank has first done any of the following:

(1) Paid the item in cash.

(2) Settled for the item without having a right to revoke the settlement under statute, clearing house rule, or agreement.

(3) Made a provisional settlement for the item and failed to revoke the settlement in the time and manner permitted by statute, clearing house rule, or agreement.

(b) If provisional settlement for an item does not become final, the item is not finally paid.

(c) If provisional settlement for an item between the presenting and payor banks is made through a clearing house or by debits or credits in an account between them, then to the extent that provisional debits or credits for the item are entered in accounts between the presenting and payor banks or between the presenting and successive
 prior collecting banks seriatim, they become final upon final payment of the items by the payor bank.

(d) If a collecting bank receives a settlement for an item which is or becomes final, the bank is accountable to its customer for the amount of the item and any provisional credit given for the item in an account with its customer becomes final.

(e) Subject to (i) applicable law stating a time for availability of funds and (ii) any right of the bank to apply the credit to an obligation of the customer, credit given by a bank for an item in a customer’s account becomes available for withdrawal as of right:

(1) If the bank has received a provisional settlement for the item, when the settlement becomes final and the bank has had a reasonable time to receive return of the item and the item has not been received within that time.

(2) If the bank is both the depositary bank and the payor bank, and
 the item is finally paid, the opening of the bank’s second banking day following receipt of the item.

(f) Subject to applicable law stating a time for availability of funds and any right of a bank to apply a deposit to an obligation of the depositor, a deposit of money becomes available for withdrawal as of right at the opening of the bank’s next banking day after receipt of the deposit.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4213 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4216.

(a) If an item is in or comes into the possession of a payor or collecting bank that suspends payment and the item has not been finally paid, the item shall be returned by the receiver, trustee, or agent in charge of the closed bank to the presenting bank or the closed bank’s customer.

(b) If a payor bank finally pays an item and suspends payments without making a settlement for the item with its customer or the presenting bank which settlement is or becomes final, the owner of the item has a preferred claim against the payor bank.

(c) If a payor bank gives or a collecting bank gives or receives a provisional settlement for an item and thereafter suspends payments, the suspension does not prevent or interfere with the settlement’s becoming final if the finality occurs automatically upon the lapse of certain time or the happening of certain events.

(d) If a collecting bank receives
 from subsequent parties settlement for an item, which settlement is or becomes final and the bank suspends payments without making a settlement for the item with its customer which settlement is or becomes final, the owner of the item has a preferred claim against the collecting bank.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4214 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Collection of Items: Payor Banks [4301. - 4303.]

4301.

(a) If a payor bank settles for a demand item other than a documentary draft presented otherwise than for immediate payment over the counter before midnight of the banking day of receipt, the payor bank may revoke the settlement and recover the settlement if, before it has made final payment and before its midnight deadline, it either:

(1) Returns the item.

(2) Sends written notice of dishonor or nonpayment if the item is unavailable for return.

(b) If a demand item is received by a payor bank for credit on its books, it may return the item or send notice of dishonor and may revoke any credit given or recover the amount thereof withdrawn by its customer, if it acts within the time limit and in the manner specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Unless previous notice of dishonor has been sent an item is dishonored at the time when for purposes of dishonor it is
 returned or notice sent in accordance with this section.

(d) An item is returned either:

(1) As to an item presented through a clearing house, when it is delivered to the presenting or last collecting bank or to the clearing house or is sent or delivered in accordance with clearing house rules.

(2) In all other cases, when it is sent or delivered to the bank’s customer or transferor or pursuant to his instructions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4302.

(a) If an item is presented to and received by a payor bank, the bank is accountable for the amount of either:

(1) A demand item, other than a documentary draft, whether properly payable or not, if the bank, in any case in which it is not also the depositary bank, retains the item beyond midnight of the banking day of receipt without settling for it or, whether or not it is also the depositary bank, does not pay or return the item or send notice of dishonor until after its midnight deadline.

(2) Any other properly payable item unless, within the time allowed for acceptance or payment of that item, the bank either accepts or pays the item or returns it and accompanying documents.

(b) The liability of a payor bank to pay an item pursuant to subdivision (a) is subject to defenses based on breach of a presentment warranty (Section 4208) or proof that the person seeking enforcement of the
 liability presented or transferred the item for the purpose of defrauding the payor bank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4303.

(a) Any knowledge, notice, or stop-payment order received by, legal process served upon, or setoff exercised by a payor bank comes too late to terminate, suspend, or modify the bank’s right or duty to pay an item or to charge its customer’s account for the item if the knowledge, notice, stop-payment order, or legal process is received or served and a reasonable time for the bank to act thereon expires or the setoff is exercised after the earliest of the following:

(1) The bank accepts or certifies the item.

(2) The bank pays the item in cash.

(3) The bank settles for the item without having a right to revoke the settlement under statute, clearing house rule, or agreement.

(4) The bank becomes accountable for the amount of the item under Section 4302 dealing with the payor bank’s responsibility for late return of items.

(5) With
 respect to checks, a cutoff hour no earlier than one hour after the opening of the next banking day after the banking day on which the bank received the check and no later than the close of that next banking day or, if no cutoff hour is fixed, the close of the next banking day after the banking day on which the bank received the check.

(b) Subject to subdivision (a), items may be accepted, paid, certified, or charged to the indicated account of its customer in any order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Relationship Between Payor Bank and Its Customer [4401. - 4407.]

4401.

(a) A bank may charge against the account of a customer an item that is properly payable from that account even though the charge creates an overdraft. An item is properly payable if it is authorized by the customer and is in accordance with any agreement between the customer and bank.

(b) A customer is not liable for the amount of an overdraft if the customer neither signed the item nor benefited from the proceeds of the item.

(c) A bank may charge against the account of a customer a check that is otherwise properly payable from the account, even though payment was made before the date of the check, unless the customer has given notice to the bank of the postdating describing the check with reasonable certainty. The notice is effective for the period stated in subdivision (b) of Section 4403 for stop-payment orders, and shall be received at such time and in such manner as to afford the bank a reasonable
 opportunity to act on it before the bank takes any action with respect to the check described in Section 4303. If a bank charges against the account of a customer a check before the date stated in the notice of postdating, the bank is liable for damages for the loss resulting from its act. The loss may include damages for dishonor of subsequent items under Section 4402.

(d) A bank that in good faith makes payment to a holder may charge the indicated account of its customer according to either:

(1) The original terms of the altered item.

(2) The terms of the completed item, even though the bank knows the item has been completed unless the bank has notice that the completion was improper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4402.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a payor bank wrongfully dishonors an item if it dishonors an item that is properly payable, but a bank may dishonor an item that would create an overdraft unless it has agreed to pay the overdraft.

(b) A payor bank is liable to its customer for damages proximately caused by the wrongful dishonor of an item. Liability is limited to actual damages proved and may include damages for an arrest or prosecution of the customer or other consequential damages. Whether any consequential damages are proximately caused by the wrongful dishonor is a question of fact to be determined in each case.

(c) A payor bank’s determination of the customer’s account balance on which a decision to dishonor for insufficiency of available funds is based may be made at any time between the time the item is received by the payor bank and the time that the payor bank returns the item or gives
 notice in lieu of return, and no more than one determination need be made. If, at the election of the payor bank, a subsequent balance determination is made for the purpose of reevaluating the bank’s decision to dishonor the item, the account balance at that time is determinative of whether a dishonor for insufficiency of available funds is wrongful.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4403.

(a) A customer or any person authorized to draw on the account if there is more than one person may stop payment of any item drawn on the customer’s account or close the account by an order to the bank describing the item or account with reasonable certainty received at a time and in a manner that affords the bank a reasonable opportunity to act on it before any action by the bank with respect to the item described in Section 4303. If the signature of more than one person is required to draw on an account, any of these persons may stop payment or close the account.

(b) A stop-payment order is effective for six months, but it lapses after 14 calendar days if the original order was oral and was not confirmed in writing within that period. A stop-payment order may be renewed for additional six-month periods by a writing given to the bank within a period during which the stop-payment order is effective.

(c) The
 burden of establishing the fact and amount of loss resulting from the payment of an item contrary to a stop-payment order or order to close an account is on the customer. The loss from payment of an item contrary to a stop-payment order may include damages for dishonor of subsequent items under Section 4402.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4404.

A bank is under no obligation to a customer having a checking account to pay a check, other than a certified check, which is presented more than six months after its date, but it may charge its customer’s account for a payment made thereafter in good faith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4405.

(a) A payor or collecting bank’s authority to accept, pay, or collect an item or to account for proceeds of its collection, if otherwise effective, is not rendered ineffective by incompetence of a customer of either bank existing at the time the item is issued or its collection is undertaken if the bank does not know of an adjudication of incompetence. Neither death nor incompetence of a customer revokes the authority to accept, pay, collect, or account until the bank knows of the fact of death or of an adjudication of incompetence and has reasonable opportunity to act on it.

(b) Even with knowledge, a bank may, for 10 days after the date of death, pay or certify checks drawn on or before that date unless ordered to stop payment by a person claiming an interest in the account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4406.

(a) A bank that sends or makes available to a customer a statement of account showing payment of items for the account shall either return or make available to the customer the items paid or provide information in the statement of account sufficient to allow the customer to reasonably identify the items paid. The statement of account provides sufficient information if the item is described by item number, amount, and date of payment. If the bank does not return the items, it shall provide in the statement of account the telephone number that the customer may call to request an item, a substitute check, or a legible copy thereof pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) If the items
 are not returned to the customer, the person retaining the items shall either retain the items or, if the items are destroyed, maintain the capacity to furnish legible copies of the items until the expiration of seven years after receipt of the items. A customer may request an item from the bank that paid the item, and that bank shall provide in a reasonable time either the item or, if the item has been destroyed or is not otherwise obtainable, a legible copy of the item. If the paid item requested by a customer was presented as a substitute check, the bank shall provide, in a reasonable time, either the substitute check or, if the substitute check has been destroyed or is not otherwise obtainable, a legible copy of the substitute check. A bank shall provide, upon request, and without charge to the customer, at least two items, substitute checks, or legible copies thereof, with respect to each statement of
 account sent to the customer.

(c) If a bank sends or makes available a statement of account or items pursuant to subdivision (a), the customer shall exercise reasonable promptness in examining the statement or the items to determine whether any payment was not authorized because of an alteration of an item or because a purported signature by or on behalf of the customer was not authorized. If, based on the statement or items provided, the customer should reasonably have discovered the unauthorized payment, the customer shall promptly notify the bank of the relevant facts.

(d) If the bank proves that the customer failed, with respect to an item, to comply with the duties imposed on the customer by subdivision (c), the customer is precluded from asserting any of the following
 against the bank:

(1) The customer’s unauthorized signature or any alteration on the item if the bank also proves that it suffered a loss by reason of the failure.

(2) The customer’s unauthorized signature or alteration by the same wrongdoer on any other item paid in good faith by the bank if the payment was made before the bank received notice from the customer of the unauthorized signature or alteration and after the customer had been afforded a reasonable period of time, not exceeding 30 days, in which to examine the item or statement of account and notify the bank.

(e) If subdivision (d) applies and the customer proves that the bank failed to exercise ordinary care in paying the item and that the failure
 contributed to loss, the loss is allocated between the customer precluded and the bank asserting the preclusion according to the extent to which the failure of the customer to comply with subdivision (c) and the failure of the bank to exercise ordinary care contributed to the loss. If the customer proves that the bank did not pay the item in good faith, the preclusion under subdivision (d) does not apply.

(f) Without regard to care or lack of care of either the customer or the bank, a customer who does not within one year after the statement or items are made available to the customer (subdivision (a)) discover and report the customer’s unauthorized signature on or any alteration on the item is precluded from asserting against the bank the unauthorized signature or alteration. If there is a preclusion under this subdivision, the payer bank may not
 recover for breach of warranty under Section 4208 with respect to the unauthorized signature or alteration to which the preclusion applies.

(g) As used in this section, “substitute check” shall have the same meaning as used in Section 229.2 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   (AB 2907)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4407.

If a payor bank has paid an item over the order of the drawer or maker to stop payment, or after an account has been closed, or otherwise under circumstances giving a basis for objection by the drawer or maker, to prevent unjust enrichment and only to the extent necessary to prevent loss to the bank by reason of its payment of the item, the payor bank is subrogated to the rights of all of the following:

(a) Of any holder in due course on the item against the drawer or maker.

(b) Of the payee or any other holder of the item against the drawer or maker either on the item or under the transaction out of which the item arose.

(c) Of the drawer or maker against the payee or any other holder of the item with respect to the transaction out of which the item arose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Collection of Documentary Drafts [4501. - 4504.]

4501.

A bank that takes a documentary draft for collection shall present or send the draft and accompanying documents for presentment and, upon learning that the draft has not been paid or accepted in due course, shall seasonably notify its customer of the fact even though it may have discounted or bought the draft or extended credit available for withdrawal as of right.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4502.

If a draft or the relevant instructions require presentment “on arrival,” “when goods arrive” or the like, the collecting bank need not present until in its judgment a reasonable time for arrival of the goods has expired. Refusal to pay or accept because the goods have not arrived is not dishonor; the bank shall notify its transferor of the refusal but need not present the draft again until it is instructed to do so or learns of the arrival of the goods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4503.

Unless otherwise instructed and except as provided in Division 5 (commencing with Section 5101), a bank presenting a documentary draft:(a) Shall deliver the documents to the drawee on acceptance of the draft if it is payable more than three days after presentment; otherwise, only on payment.(b) Upon dishonor, either in the case of presentment for acceptance or presentment for payment, may seek and follow instructions from any referee in case of need designated in the draft or, if the presenting bank does not choose to utilize the referee’s services, it shall use diligence and good faith to ascertain the reason for dishonor, shall notify its transferor of the dishonor and of the results of its effort to ascertain the reasons therefor, and shall request instructions.However, the presenting bank is under no obligation with
 respect to goods represented by the documents except to follow any reasonable instructions seasonably received; it has a right to reimbursement for any expense incurred in following instructions and to prepayment of or indemnity for those expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4504.

(a) A presenting bank that, following the dishonor of a documentary draft, has seasonably requested instructions but does not receive them within a reasonable time may store, sell, or otherwise deal with the goods in any reasonable manner.

(b) For its reasonable expenses incurred by action under subdivision (a), the presenting bank has a lien upon the goods or their proceeds, which may be foreclosed in the same manner as an unpaid seller’s lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. LETTERS OF CREDIT [5101. - 5118.]

5101.

This division may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code—Letters of Credit.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5102.

(a) In this division:

(1) “Adviser” means a person who, at the request of the issuer, a confirmer, or another adviser, notifies or requests another adviser to notify the beneficiary that a letter of credit has been issued, confirmed, or amended.

(2) “Applicant” means a person at whose request or for whose account a letter of credit is issued. The term includes a person who requests an issuer to issue a letter of credit on behalf of another if the person making the request undertakes an obligation to reimburse the issuer.

(3) “Beneficiary” means a person who under the terms of a letter of credit is entitled to have its complying presentation honored. The term includes a person to whom drawing rights have been transferred under a transferable letter of credit.

(4) “Confirmer” means a nominated person who undertakes, at the request or with the consent of the
 issuer, to honor a presentation under a letter of credit issued by another.

(5) “Dishonor” of a letter of credit means failure timely to honor or to take an interim action, such as acceptance of a draft, that may be required by the letter of credit.

(6) “Document” means a draft or other demand, document of title, investment security, certificate, invoice, or other record, statement, or representation of fact, law, right, or opinion (i) which is presented in a written or other medium permitted by the letter of credit or, unless prohibited by the letter of credit, by the standard practice referred to in subdivision (e) of Section 5108 and (ii) which is capable of being examined for compliance with the terms and conditions of the letter of credit. A document may not be oral.

(7) “Good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct or transaction concerned.

(8) “Honor” of a letter of credit means
 performance of the issuer’s undertaking in the letter of credit to pay or deliver an item of value. Unless the letter of credit otherwise provides, “honor” occurs

(i) upon payment,

(ii) if the letter of credit provides for acceptance, upon acceptance of a draft and, at maturity, its payment, or

(iii) if the letter of credit provides for incurring a deferred obligation, upon incurring the obligation and, at maturity, its performance.

(9) “Issuer” means a bank or other person that issues a letter of credit, but does not include an individual who makes an engagement for personal, family, or household purposes.

(10) “Letter of credit” means a definite undertaking that satisfies the requirements of Section 5104 by an issuer to a beneficiary at the request or for the account of an applicant or, in the case of a financial institution, to itself or for its own account, to
 honor a documentary presentation by payment or delivery of an item of value.

(11) “Nominated person” means a person whom the issuer (i) designates or authorizes to pay, accept, negotiate, or otherwise give value under a letter of credit and (ii) undertakes by agreement or custom and practice to reimburse.

(12) “Presentation” means delivery of a document to an issuer or nominated person for honor or giving of value under a letter of credit.

(13) “Presenter” means a person making a presentation as or on behalf of a beneficiary or nominated person.

(14) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium, or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(15) “Successor of a beneficiary” means a person who succeeds to substantially all of the rights of a beneficiary by operation of law, including a corporation with
 or into which the beneficiary has been merged or consolidated, an administrator, executor, personal representative, trustee in bankruptcy, debtor in possession, liquidator, and receiver.

(b) Definitions in other divisions applying to this division and the sections in which they appear are:

“Accept” or “Acceptance”Section 3409

“Value”Sections 3303, 4211

(c) Division 1 contains certain additional general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.

(a) This division applies to letters of credit and to certain rights and obligations arising out of transactions involving letters of credit.

(b) The statement of a rule in this division does not by itself require, imply, or negate application of the same or a different rule to a situation not provided for, or to a person not specified, in this division.

(c) With the exception of this subdivision, subdivisions (a) and (d), paragraphs 9 and 10 of subdivision (a) of Section 5102, subdivision (d) of Section 5106, and subdivision (d) of Section 5114, and except to the extent prohibited in Section 1302 and subdivision (d) of Section 5117, the effect of this division may be varied by agreement or by a provision stated or incorporated by reference in an undertaking. A term in an agreement or undertaking
 generally excusing liability or generally limiting remedies for failure to perform obligations is not sufficient to vary obligations prescribed by this division.

(d) Rights and obligations of an issuer to a beneficiary or a nominated person under a letter of credit are independent of the existence, performance, or nonperformance of a contract or arrangement out of which the letter of credit arises or which underlies it, including contracts or arrangements between the issuer and the applicant and between the applicant and the beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5104.

A letter of credit, confirmation, advice, transfer, amendment, or cancellation may be issued in any form that is a signed record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 15.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.

Consideration is not required to issue, amend, transfer, or cancel a letter of credit, advice, or confirmation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5106.

(a) A letter of credit is issued and becomes enforceable according to its terms against the issuer when the issuer sends or otherwise transmits it to the person requested to advise or to the beneficiary. A letter of credit is revocable only if it so provides.

(b) After a letter of credit is issued, rights and obligations of a beneficiary, applicant, confirmer, and issuer are not affected by an amendment or cancellation to which that person has not consented except to the extent the letter of credit provides that it is revocable or that the issuer may amend or cancel the letter of credit without that consent.

(c) If there is no stated expiration date or other provision that determines its duration, a letter of credit expires one year after its stated date of issuance or, if none is stated, after the date on which it is issued.

(d) A letter of credit that states that it is perpetual
 expires five years after its stated date of issuance, or if none is stated, after the date on which it is issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5107.

(a) A confirmer is directly obligated on a letter of credit and has the rights and obligations of an issuer to the extent of its confirmation. The confirmer also has rights against and obligations to the issuer as if the issuer were an applicant and the confirmer had issued the letter of credit at the request and for the account of the issuer.

(b) A nominated person who is not a confirmer is not obligated to honor or otherwise give value for a presentation.

(c) A person requested to advise may decline to act as an adviser. An adviser that is not a confirmer is not obligated to honor or give value for a presentation. An adviser undertakes to the issuer and to the beneficiary accurately to advise the terms of the letter of credit, confirmation, amendment, or advice received by that person and undertakes to the beneficiary to check the apparent authenticity of the request to advise. Even if the advice is inaccurate,
 the letter of credit, confirmation, or amendment is enforceable as issued.

(d) A person who notifies a transferee beneficiary of the terms of a letter of credit, confirmation, amendment, or advice has the rights and obligations of an adviser under subdivision (c). The terms in the notice to the transferee beneficiary may differ from the terms in any notice to the transferor beneficiary to the extent permitted by the letter of credit, confirmation, amendment, or advice received by the person who so notifies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5108.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 5109, an issuer shall honor a presentation that, as determined by the standard practice referred to in subdivision (e), appears on its face strictly to comply with the terms and conditions of the letter of credit. Except as otherwise provided in Section 5113 and unless otherwise agreed with the applicant, an issuer shall dishonor a presentation that does not appear so to comply.

(b) An issuer has a reasonable time after presentation, but not beyond the end of the seventh business day of the issuer after the day of its receipt of documents:

(1) to honor,

(2) if the letter of credit provides for honor to be completed more than seven business days after presentation, to accept a draft or incur a deferred obligation, or

(3) to give notice to the presenter of discrepancies in the presentation.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), an issuer is precluded from asserting as a basis for dishonor any discrepancy if timely notice is not given, or any discrepancy not stated in the notice if timely notice is given.

(d) Failure to give the notice specified in subdivision (b) or to mention fraud, forgery, or expiration in the notice does not preclude the issuer from asserting as a basis for dishonor fraud or forgery as described in subdivision (a) of Section 5109 or expiration of the letter of credit before presentation.

(e) An issuer shall observe standard practice of financial institutions that regularly issue letters of credit. Determination of the issuer’s observance of the standard practice is a matter of interpretation for the court. The court shall offer the parties a reasonable opportunity to present evidence of the standard practice.

(f) An issuer is not responsible for:

(1) the performance or nonperformance of the underlying contract, arrangement, or transaction,

(2) an act or omission of others, or

(3) observance or knowledge of the usage of a particular trade other than the standard practice referred to in subdivision (e).

(g) If an undertaking constituting a letter of credit under paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 5102 contains nondocumentary conditions, an issuer shall disregard the nondocumentary conditions and treat them as if they were not stated.

(h) An issuer that has dishonored a presentation shall return the documents or hold them at the disposal of, and send advice to that effect to, the presenter.

(i) An issuer that has honored a presentation as permitted or required by this division:

(1) is entitled to be reimbursed by the applicant in immediately
 available funds not later than the date of its payment of funds;

(2) takes the documents free of claims of the beneficiary or presenter;

(3) is precluded from asserting a right of recourse on a draft under Sections 3414 and 3415;

(4) except as otherwise provided in Sections 5110 and 5117, is precluded from restitution of money paid or other value given by mistake to the extent the mistake concerns discrepancies in the documents or tender which are apparent on the face of the presentation; and

(5) is discharged to the extent of its performance under the letter of credit unless the issuer honored a presentation in which a required signature of a beneficiary was forged.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5109.
